Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 51
POSTSECONDARY ENROLLMENT OPTIONS

Section.

33-5101. Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote rigorous academic pursuits and to provide a wider variety of options to high school pupils by encouraging and enabling secondary pupils to enroll full-time or part-time in nonsectarian courses or programs in eligible postsecondary institutions as defined in section 33-5102, Idaho Code.

33-5102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Course” means a course of instruction or a program of instruction.

“Dual credit” means credit awarded to a student on his or her secondary and postsecondary transcript for the completion of a single course.

“Eligible institution” means a public or private postsecondary educational institution accredited by an organization recognized by the state board of education.

“Postsecondary credit” means credit awarded to a student on his or her postsecondary transcript for the completion of a course.

“Secondary credit” means credit awarded to a student on his or her secondary transcript for the completion of a course.

33-5103. Authorization — Notification.

Notwithstanding any other law, administrative rule or local policy to the contrary, a secondary pupil enrolled in a public school may apply to an eligible institution to enroll in nonsectarian courses offered by that postsecondary institution. If an institution accepts a secondary pupil for enrollment under the provisions of this chapter, the institution shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil’s school district within ten (10) days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment of that pupil. If the pupil enrolls in a course for postsecondary credit, the institution shall notify the pupil about payment in the customary manner used by the institution.

33-5104. Counseling.

To the extent possible, the school district shall provide counseling services to pupils and their parents or guardians before the pupil enrolls in courses under the provisions of this chapter to ensure that the pupil and parents or guardian are fully aware of the risks and possible consequences of enrolling in postsecondary courses. Counseling services shall include information on the program including who may enroll, what institutions and sources are available under this program, the decision-making process for granting academic or career technical credits, financial arrangements for tuition, books and materials, eligibility criteria for transportation aid, available support services, the need to arrange an appropriate schedule, consequences of failing or not completing a course in which the pupil enrolls, the effect of enrolling in this program on the pupil’s ability to complete the required high school graduation requirements, financial aid and the academic and social responsibilities that must be assumed by the pupil and the parents or guardian. The person providing counseling shall encourage pupils and their parents or guardian to also use available counseling services at the postsecondary institutions prior to the semester of enrollment to ensure that anticipated plans are appropriate and adequate.

33-5105. Dissemination of information — Notification of intent to enroll.

By March 1 of each year, a school district shall provide general information about the program to all secondary pupils.

33-5106. Limit on participation.

If a pupil’s enrollment pursuant to this chapter decreases the pupil’s instructional time in the local school district to less than four (4) hours a day, the pupil shall nevertheless be counted as in local school district instructional time for four (4) hours a day for purposes of chapter 10, title 33, Idaho Code.

A pupil who has completed course requirements for graduation but who has not received a diploma may participate in the program.

A pupil who has graduated from high school cannot participate in the program.

33-5107. Enrollment priority.

A postsecondary institution shall give priority to its postsecondary students when enrolling secondary students in courses for secondary credit only. Once a pupil has been enrolled in a postsecondary course under the provisions of this chapter, the pupil shall not be displaced by another student.

33-5108. Courses according to agreements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 27, § 7, effective July 1, 2014.

33-5109. Credits.

A pupil may enroll in a course under the provisions of this chapter for secondary credit, for postsecondary credit or for dual credit. At the time a pupil enrolls in a course, the pupil shall designate the type of credit desired. A pupil taking several courses may designate some for secondary credit, some for postsecondary credit and some for dual credit.

A school district shall grant academic or career technical credit, as applicable to the course, to a pupil enrolled in a course for secondary credit if the pupil successfully completes the course. Four (4) semester college credits equal at least one (1) full year (two (2) semester credits) of high school credit in that subject. Fewer college credits may be prorated.

The secondary credits granted to a pupil shall be counted toward the graduation requirements and subject area requirements of the school district. Evidence of successful completion of each course and secondary credits granted shall be included in the pupil’s secondary school record. A pupil shall provide the school with a copy of the pupil’s grade in each course taken for secondary credit under the provisions of this chapter. Upon the request of a pupil, the pupil’s secondary school record shall also include evidence of successful completion and credits granted for a course taken for postsecondary credit. In either case, the record shall indicate that the credits were earned at a postsecondary institution.

If a pupil enrolls in a postsecondary institution after leaving secondary school, the postsecondary institution shall award postsecondary credit for any course successfully completed for secondary credit at that institution. Other postsecondary institutions may award, after a pupil leaves secondary school, postsecondary credit for any courses successfully completed under the provisions of this chapter. An institution shall not charge a pupil for the award of credit.

Postsecondary faculty instructing a course for postsecondary, secondary or dual credit shall not be required to obtain a certificate pursuant to chapter 12, title 33, Idaho Code, nor shall the postsecondary faculty be deemed an employee of a school district for any purpose under law.

33-5110. Financial arrangements.

For a pupil enrolled in a course under the provisions of this chapter, the school district may make payments or partial payments according to the provisions of this section for courses that were taken for secondary credit.

The school district superintendent shall not make payments to a postsecondary institution for a course taken for postsecondary credit only. The district superintendent shall not make payments to a postsecondary institution for a course from which a student officially withdraws during the first fourteen (14) days of the semester or for courses for audit.